Arkansas, session 2025, HB1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-5-705(a), concerning payment of a claim
to designated beneficiaries or survivors of certain specified public
employees killed in the line of duty, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The state shall pay the additional sum of one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($150,000) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to
the qualified recipient or recipients of a:
(1) Police officer, wildlife enforcement officer or game warden,
commissioned law enforcement officer or emergency response employee of the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, Division of Community Correction
employee, employee of the Division of Correction, jailer, or coroner, or
state highway employee whose death occurred:
(A) After January 1, 2003; and
*SSS116*
03-06-2025 10:20:15 SSS116

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 H3/6/25 HB1293
(B) Either:
(i) In the official line of duty as the result of a
criminal or negligent action of another person or persons or as the result of
the engagement in exceptionally hazardous duty; or
(ii) In the line of duty while the officer or
employee was performing emergency medical activities;
(2) Firefighter, emergency medical technician, or employee of
the Arkansas Forestry Commission killed after July 1, 1987, while responding
to, engaging in, or returning from a fire, a rescue incident, a hazardous
material or bomb incident, an emergency medical activity, or simulated
training thereof; and
(3)(A)(i) Firefighter killed in the line of duty after January
1, 2012, including death from leukemia, lymphoma, mesothelioma, and multiple
myeloma and cancer of the brain, digestive tract, urinary tract, liver, skin,
breast, cervix, thyroid, prostate, testicle, or a cancer that has been found
by research and statistics to show higher instances of occurrence in
firefighters than in the general population, if he or she was exposed to a
known carcinogen as determined by the Department of Health with consideration
to the findings of the International Agency for Research on Cancer while in
the official line of duty.
(ii) Subdivision (a)(3)(A)(i) of this section does
not include a firefighter who was diagnosed with cancer prior to the start of
firefighter service.
(B) A death benefit under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section shall be limited to:
(i) A maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars
($150,000) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per individual
death, including educational benefits provided in § 6-82-501 et seq.; and
(ii) A firefighter who is under sixty-eight (68)
years of age.
(C)(i) The Firefighter Benefit Review Panel is created for
the purpose of making recommendations to the Arkansas State Claims Commission
regarding determinations of death benefits under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of
this section for deaths associated with cancer.
(ii) The panel shall consist of the following seven
(7) individuals to be appointed by the Governor:
03-06-2025 10:20:15 SSS116

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 H3/6/25 HB1293
(a) One (1) licensed oncologist;
(b)(1) Two (2) firefighters paid by the state,
a county, or a municipality.
(2) One (1) firefighter under
subdivision (a)(3)(C)(ii)(b)(1) of this section shall be appointed from a
list of names submitted by the Arkansas Professional Fire Fighters
Association;
(c)(1) Two (2) volunteer firefighters.
(2) One (1) firefighter under
subdivision (a)(3)(C)(ii)(c)(1) of this section shall be appointed from a
list of names submitted by the Arkansas State Firefighters Association, Inc.;
(d) One (1) fire chief who may be appointed
from a list of names submitted by the Arkansas Association of Fire Chiefs;
and
(e) One (1) citizen with experience in either
cancer and healthcare professions or firefighter relations.
(iii)(a) Panel members shall serve a term of four
(4) years.
(b) In the event of a vacancy in the
membership of the panel, the Governor shall appoint a person meeting the
applicable eligibility requirements of the vacated position to fill the
vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(iv)(a) The panel shall hold at least one (1)
regular meeting in each calendar year at a time and place determined by the
panel.
(b) Special meetings may be called at the
discretion of the chair selected under subdivision (a)(3)(C)(v) of this
section.
(v) The panel shall select a chair and vice chair
during the first annual meeting of each four-year term.
(vi) Four (4) members of the panel constitute a
quorum to transact business.
(vii) The members of the panel may receive expense
reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.
(viii) The panel shall:
(a) Render advisory opinions and reports
03-06-2025 10:20:15 SSS116

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 H3/6/25 HB1293
concerning research and statistics that show higher instances of cancer among
firefighters;
(b) Review claims for death benefits of
firefighters who have died of cancer; and
(c) Make recommendations to the Arkansas State
Claims Commission on death benefit awards under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section.
(D) This section:
(i) Does not apply to any other benefits granted by
the state, a county, a city, or a municipality; and
(ii) Does not grant a cause of action against the
state, a county, a city, or a municipality.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-5-705(c)(2)(A), concerning payment of a
claim to designated beneficiaries or survivors of certain specified public
employees killed in the line of duty, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) One hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) of the one hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($150,000) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) provided in
subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be paid by the appropriate state
department agency fund account.

/s/Andrews













03-06-2025 10:20:15 SSS116